Massachusetts, session 194th, H3831.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: Section 1 of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 53 after the word “day” the following:- 
; or (f) is an actively serving member of the Army or Air Force National Guard who 
resides in Massachusetts or an actively servicing member of the Reserve component residing in 
Massachusetts.